hyph-utf8/tex/generic/hyph-utf8/patterns/tex/hyph-ka.tex
უ2შთ
უ2შრ
2უშულ
უ2შ1ფ
უ1ჩ1
2უჩდ
2უჩე
უ2ჩლ
უ2ჩნ
უ1ც
უ2ცდ
უ2ცვ
უ2ცნ
უ2ცქ
უ1ძა
უ2ძგ
უ1ძე
უძ3ვ
უძ3ლ
უძ1ნ
უძ3რ
უ1წ
უ2წვ
უწ5კ
უ2წ3რ
უ1ჭ
უ2ჭნ
უ1ხე
უხ3ვ
უხ1ნ
უ1ხო
უ1ხუ
უ1ჯ
უ2ჯვ
უჴ1
ფ4ა
2ფ1ბ
2ფ1დ
1ფ4ე
4ფენილთ
ფეტ1
ფეხ1
2ფ1ვ4
2ფ3ზ2
2ფ5თ4
1ფ2ი
2ფივნ
ფიზ3
ფით1
ფიქ1
ფი3ჩ
2ფკ
2ფ3ლ4
2ფ1მ
2ფ1ნ
1ფ4ო
2ფ1პ
2ფ1რ2
ფრაი1
ფ3რ4ბ
ფ3რდ
ფ3რვ
4ფ4რთ
ფ5რ4თე
ფ3რმ
ფ5რ4ფ
2ფ3ს4
4ფს.
2ფ1ტ4
1ფ2უ
ფურ1
ფუქ1
ფუძ1
2ფ1ფ
2ფ1ქ4
2ფ5შ2
2ფჩ
2ფ1ც
1ფ2ხ2
ფ3ჯ4
1ქ4ა
ქარ1
ქ1ბ2
ქ3ბდ
ქ1და
ქ1დე
1ქ4ე
ქ2ვ4
ქ3ვდ
ქ3ვე
ქვეყ1
ქ1ვმ
ქ3ვნ
ქ3ვს
ქ1ზ
ქ1თ4
1ქ4ი
3ქ1ლ4
ქმ6
ქ3მდ
ქ5მზ
ქ3მპ
2ქმს
2ქ1ნ4
ქ3ნბ
ქ3ნგ
ქ3ნმ
ქ3ნც
1ქ4ო
ქორ1
ქ1პ
ქ1რ4
ქ3რბ
ქ3რდ
ქ3რზ
ქ3რთ
ქ3რმ
ქ3რს
ქ3რტ
ქ3რშ
ქ3ს4
2ქს.
ქ1ტ4
ქტიკუ2
ქ3ტსა
1ქ4უ
ქ1ფ
ქ1ქ2
ქ1ღ
ქ3ყ2
ქ1შ
ქ1ც4
ქ3ცს
ქხ2
ღ2ა
ღამოდ1
ღაფ3
2ღ3ბ4
ღ4ბს
ღ1გ4
2ღ3დ4
1ღ2ე
ღეგ1
ღ1ვ4
ღვი1
ღ3ვკ
ღ3ვლ
ღ3ვს
2ღ3ზ4
2ღ3თ4
1ღ2ი
ღ3კ2
2ღ3ლ4
ღლა2რ1
ღ5ლს
2ღ3მ4
ღ5მთ
4ღ3ნ4
ღ3ნგ
ღ2ო
2ღ3რ6
ღრმად1
ღ5რჭ
2ღ3ს4
ღ1ტ
ღ2ტყ
1ღუ
ღ3ფ
2ღ1ქ2
ღ3ყ2
ღ1შ
ღ1ჩ4
ღ1ძ2
2ღ1წ4
ღ3წვ
ღ1ჭ
ღ1ხ
1ყ2ა
3ყავ
3ყარა
2ყ3ბ
ყბაგა1
2ყ1დ2
ყ2ე
3ყება
3ყევ
1ყეო
2ყ1ვ4
3ყვებაო
3ყვებია
3ყვეო.
3ყვეს
ყ3ვზ
ყ3ვთ
ყვით1
ყ3ვლ
3ყვნენო
ყ3ვს
2ყ1ზ
2ყ1თ
ყ2ი
3ყიდ
ყისფერ3
2ყ1ლ4
2ყმ4
ყ1მა
ყ3მყ
2ყ1ნ4
ყ3ნდ
ყ3ნვ
ყ2ო
2ყოთ
3ყოლ
2ყ1რ4
ყ3რდ
ყ3რლ
ყ3რმ
2ყს2
4ყტ
ყ1ტო
ყ2უ
3ყუდ
2ყშ
2ყწ
2ყ1ჯ
4ყ6ჰ
1შ2ა
3შა.
3შამ
2შ1ბ
2შ1გ
2შ1დ
1შ2ე1
3შებ
შეიერ3
შემოდ1
2შენთ
2შ1ვ4
შ3ვბ
შ3ვლ
3შვნებ
3შვნეტ
შ3ვს
2შ1ზ4
2შ1თ2
შ3თთ
1შ2ი
შიორ3
3შის
შიფ1
შიშ1
2შ3კ2
2შ3ლ4
2შ1მ4
შ3მგ
შ3მრ
2შ1ნ4
შ3ნვ
შ3ნლ
1შ2ო
2შპ2
შ1პო
შ3რ4
4შ1ს2
შ3სწ
2შ1ტ2
შ3ტდ
1შუ
შუღ3
2შფ2
2შ1ქ4
2შყ
2შ3შ2
2შ1ჩ
2შ1ხ2
2შ1ჯ
1ჩ2ა
ჩაეგ1
4ჩარო
2ჩ1ბ
4ჩ1დ
1ჩ2ე
ჩეინ1
2ჩ1ვ2
ჩ4ვზ
ჩვ4რ
2ჩ1ზ
2ჩ1თ
1ჩ2ი
ჩ1ლუ
2ჩ1მ2
ჩ3ნ4
2ჩნდა
2ჩნდე
2ჩნდია
2ჩნდნ
ჩ4ნვ
ჩ5ნს
3ჩ2ო
ჩორ1
2ჩპ
2ჩ3რ2
2ჩს
4ჩ1ტ
1ჩ2უ
4ჩურუ
2ჩ3ქ2
2ჩშ
3ჩ2ხ4
5ჩხე
4ჩხს
ჩჰ2
ც2ა1
ცატარ1
2ც3ბ2
ც1დ2
2ცდ.
ც2ე
ც3ვ4
2ცვ.
ცვიფ1
2ცვს
2ც1ზ
2ც1თ4
ც2ი1
1ციელ
ციზ3
ციტო3
ციც1
2ც3კ4
2ც1ლ
2ც1მ6
ც3მლ
ც3მყ
ც3მძ
ც3მხ
ც1ნ4
ც3ნბ
ც3ნნ
4ცნს
ც2ო
ცოსე2
2ცპ
3ც1რ2
ც3რდ
ც3რმ
ც3რც
2ც3ს4
2ც3ტ4
ც2უ
2ცფ
ცქ4
ც1ქდ
ც3ქნ
2ც1ღ
2ც1ყ
3ცშ
2ც1ჩ
2ც1ც
2ც3ძ2
ც3წ2
3ც2ხ6
4ცხ.
5ცხე
4ცხვ.
4ცხლს.
5ცხობე
5ცხობლ
4ცხს
2ც1ჯ
2ცჰ2
ძ2ა
1ძაა
1ძად.
1ძამ
1ძაო
1ძას
ძაფ1
ძაღ3
1ძაცა
2ძ3ბ2
3ძ1გ2
ძ3გნ
ძ2ე
1ძებ
ძეგ1
ძერ1
ძეწ3
ძ1ვ4
2ძვე
2ძვი
ძ3ვს
2ძ1ზ
2ძ1თ
1ძ2ი
ძი2ძ1
2ძ1ლ4
ძ3ლვ
2ძ1მ4
ძ2მმ
4ძნ4
ძ1ნა
ძ3ნდ
ძ1ნე
ძ3ნრ
2ძ2ო
ძ2რ4
ძ3რო
2ძრუ
2ძრწ
4ძს
3ძ2უ
2ძულვ
ძუნ3
ძფ2
1ძ2ღ4
2ძ3ძ2
3წ2ა
2წ1ბ
2წგ
2წდ
წ1დო
3წ2ე
წეგ1
წ3ვ4
2წვად
2წვავდ
2წვას
წ3ვდ
2წვდით
2წვე
2წვი
2წვრ
4წთ
1წ2ი
2წიან
წიგ1
წით1
1წილ
წი2წ1
წიხ3
2წ4კ4
წ5კვ
წ5კმ
წ5კნ
2წ1ლ4
წ3ლმ
3წ1მ2
წ3მდ
წ3მც
4წ1ნ2
3წ2ო
წ1რ4
წ3რვ
წ3რთ
წ3რმ
წ3რრ
წ5რფ
4წს
წტ2
წ1ტვ
წ2უ1
წუწ1
წუხ1
2წ3ქ2
წ1ღ
3წ4ყ4
2წყი
4წყმენ
2წშ
წ1ც
1ჭა
ჭარ1
2ჭ1დ2
ჭ3დვ
1ჭე
ჭეშ1
2ჭ3ვ4
ჭვარ1
2ჭ1ზ
2ჭ1თ4
1ჭი
2ჭ3კ2
ჭ3ლ4
2ჭ3მ4
2ჭ1ნ
1ჭნი
1ჭო
2ჭ1რ2
ჭ3რნ
2ჭს
3ჭუ
ჭუ1კ
3ჭ2ყ2
2ჭშ
1ხ2ა
2ხადიყ
4ხარია
2ხ1ბ
2ხგ2
2ხ1დ4
ხ3დვ
ხ2ე
1ხები
4ხედვე
ხევი4ს
ხეთ1
1ხეობი
2ხეცი
2ხ1ვ4
4ხვ.
2ხ1ზ2
ხ5თ2
1ხ2ი
4ხიდვ
ხიზ1
4ხირვ
2ხ3კ4
ხ1ლ4
ხ3ლდ
ხ3ლვ
ხ3ლზ
ხლის1
ხ3ლმ
ხ4ლს
ხ5ლტ
ხ3ლშ
2ხ1მ4
ხ3მლ
ხ3მრ
ხ3მძ
ხნ4
ხ1ნა
ხ3ნდ
ხ3ნშ
ხ2ო
2ხ1პ
4ხ1რ4
ხ3რბ
ხ3რდ
ხ3რვ
ხ3რზ
ხ3რმ
ხ3რშ
ხ3რჩ
ხ3რწ
ხ3რხ
ხ3რჯ
2ხ1ს4
4ხს.
ხსაც1
ხ3სპ
ხ3სრ
ხ3სს
2ხ1ტ4
ხ2უ
2ხფ
2ხქ4
ხღ4
2ხყ
2ხ3შ2
ხ3შმ
2ხ1ჩ
2ხ1ც4
2ხ1წ2
ხწი1
2ხჭ
4ხ1ხ2
2ხჰ6
ჯ4ა
ჯაბ1
4ჯბ
ჯ1ბა
2ჯ3გ4
2ჯ1დ
ჯ4ე
ჯ2ვ4
ჯ3ვა
ჯ3ვნ
2ჯ1ზ
ჯთ2
ჯ4ი
ჯირი1
2ჯკ
2ჯ1ლ2
2ჯ1მ
2ჯ1ნ4
ჯ3ნვ
ჯ4ო
2ჯპ
2ჯ5რ4
ჯ5რი
2ჯს
ჯ4უ
ჯღ4
2ჯ1შ
2ჯხ
5ჰ4ა
2ჰ3ბ4
2ჰ3გ2
5ჰ4ე
ჰელან1
ჰ1ვ
2ჰ1ზ
3ჰ4ი
2ჰ3კ4
2ჰ1მ4
ჰ3მს
5ჰ4ო
2ჰპ
2ჰ1რ4
ჰრა2
ჰ3რჩ
ჰ4რ5ც
2ჰ1ს
3ჰ4უ
2ჰ3ფ2
ჰფრ4
2ჰ1ქ2
ჰ3ღ4
2ჰ5ყ2
3ჰყავ.
3ჰყო.
3ჰყოს
3ჰყოფთ
4ჰშ2
ჰ3ხ2
2ჰხა
2ჰხდ
2ჰხვდა
ჰ5ხრ
2ჰ1ჴ2
ჲ3თ4
ჲ3ს4
ჲუ5
3ჴ2ა
ჴ1დ
2ჴდო
3ჴ2ე
ჴ1ვ4
ჴ2თ
1ჴი
ჴ3ლ4
4ჴ1მ4
ჴ3მდ
ჴ3მრ
ჴ2ნ
1ჴ2ო
ჴო3რ2
ჴ3რ2
4ჴ3ს4
ჴსოვ1
1ჴ2უ
2ჴ3შ2
ჴ2ხ
}
